Florida, session 2026, HB865.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:

Section 1. (1) The Legislature finds that:
(a) Many businesses and communities in this state are
using paper drinking straws and stirrers as a purportedly better
option for public health and the environment. However,
independent university studies have shown that most paper straws
contain harmful PFAS chemicals, exposure to which is linked to
concerning health risks.
(b) Paper drinking straw regulations marginalize residents
with disabilities for whom paper straws are not an option.
Page 1 of 4
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb865-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 865 2026
(c) Any regulation of drinking straws and stirrers must be
based on government policy driven by science.
(2) The Legislature intends to:
(a) Combat the harmful impacts of paper drinking straws
and stirrers and provide businesses and residents of this state
with better alternatives to single-use plastic straws and
stirrers; and
(b) Promote uniformity of drinking straw and stirrer
regulations throughout this state, rather than forcing
businesses to comply with a patchwork of local regulations.
Section 2. Section 403.7034, Florida Statutes, is created
to read:
403.7034 Local regulation of drinking straws and
stirrers.—
(1) As used in this section, the term:
(a) "Certification body" means a recognized, independent,
third-party verification body, such as the Biodegradable
Products Institute or TUV Austria, which certifies products that
meet ASTM standards for compostability.
(b) "Home compostable certified" means a product certified
by a certification body as home compostable.
(c) "Industrial compostable certified" means a product
certified by a certification body as industrially compostable.
(d) "Marine biodegradable" means a product will completely
break down, biodegrade, and return to nature by decomposing into
Page 2 of 4
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb865-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 865 2026
elements found in the marine environment in less than 1 year, as
shown by competent and reliable scientific evidence.
(e) "Renewable" means a product certified under:
1. The USDA BioPreferred Program with biobased content of
at least 80 percent; or
2. The TUV Austria OK biobased program with a 4-star
rating.
(2) A local governmental entity may not enact any rule,
regulation, or ordinance regarding the use, disposition, sale,
prohibition, or restriction of drinking straws or stirrers which
does not meet the requirements of this section. By January 1,
2027, a local governmental entity shall amend any such rule,
regulation, or ordinance in effect as of the effective date of
this act which does not permit the sale or use of drinking
straws and stirrers that are renewable, home compostable
certified, industrial compostable certified, or marine
biodegradable to permit the sale or use of renewable, home
compostable certified, industrial compostable certified and
marine biodegradable drinking straws and stirrers.
(3) If a local governmental entity elects to enact any
rule, regulation, or ordinance regarding the use, disposition,
sale, prohibition, or restriction of drinking straws or
stirrers, such rule, regulation, or ordinance must require that
drinking straws or stirrers be:
(a) Renewable;
Page 3 of 4
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb865-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 865 2026
(b) Home compostable certified;
(c) Industrial compostable certified; and
(d) Marine biodegradable.
(4) This section does not apply to a drinking straw or
stirrer sold, distributed, or used in any of the following:
(a) A prepackaged drink sold at a commercial
establishment.
(b) A hospital, a medical care facility, or a senior care
facility.
(5) This section may not be construed to require a local
governmental entity to adopt any rule, regulation, or ordinance
relating to the use, disposition, sale, prohibition, or
restriction of drinking straws or stirrers.
Section 3. The Division of Law Revision is directed to
replace the phrase "the effective date of this act" wherever it
occurs in this act with the date this act becomes a law.
Section 4. This act shall take effect upon becoming a law.
Page 4 of 4
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb865-00